Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.040

Applicants—Fee—Eligibility.

Before any person may take an examination for the issuance of a podiatric physician and surgeon license, the applicant shall submit a completed application and a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250. The applicant shall also furnish the secretary and the board with satisfactory proof that:

(1) The applicant has not engaged in unprofessional conduct as defined in chapter 18.130 RCW and is not unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety as a result of a physical or mental impairment;

(2) The applicant has satisfactorily completed a course in an approved school of podiatric medicine and surgery;

(3) The applicant has completed one year of postgraduate podiatric medical training in a program approved by the board, provided that applicants graduating before July 1, 1993, shall be exempt from the postgraduate training requirement.

[ 2000 c 171 s 4; 1993 c 29 s 2; 1990 c 147 s 8; 1982 c 21 s 5; 1979 c 158 s 18; 1973 c 77 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 292 s 19; 1955 c 149 s 2; 1935 c 48 s 3; 1921 c 120 s 3; 1917 c 38 s 6; RRS s 10079.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 292: See note following RCW 26.28.010.